Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Article 6. Enforcement.

Administrative Code. —

For compliance procedures and general provisions, see 18 AAC 31, art. 9.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Drugs and Controlled Substances, § 81 et seq.

35 Am. Jur. 2d, Food, § 63 et seq.

Sec. 17.20.180.
Regulations.

The Department of Environmental Conservation and the Department of Health and Social Services may adopt regulations for the efficient enforcement of their respective portions of this chapter.
Each department may make the regulations conform, in so far as practicable, with those adopted under the federal act.

History.

(§ 21(a) ch 129 SLA 1949; am E.O. No. 51, § 20 (1981))

Administrative Code. —

For food care, see 18 AAC 31, art. 2.

For management and personnel, see 18 AAC 31, art. 3.

For equipment and utensils, see 18 AAC 31, art. 4.

For sanitation and physical facilities, see 18 AAC 31, art. 5.

For temporary food service, limited food service, kiosks, mobile food units, see 18 AAC 31, art. 6.

For food processing, see 18 AAC 31, art. 7.

For markets, see 18 AAC 31, art. 8.

For reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32, art. 3.

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

For shellfish processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 2.

For smoked or smoke-flavored seafood products processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 3.

For thermal processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 4.

For direct-market fishing vessels, see 18 AAC 34, art. 5.

For requirements for fishing vessels, tender vessels, buying stations, and processing facilities in response to oil contamination, see 18 AAC 34, art. 6.

For direct-market land-based facilities, see 18 AAC 34, art. 7.

Sec. 17.20.190.
Hearings.

Hearings authorized or required by this chapter shall be conducted under the provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 21(b) ch 129 SLA 1949)

Sec. 17.20.200.
Inspections and examinations.

The commissioner of environmental conservation or an agent shall have free access at reasonable hours to a factory, warehouse, or establishment in which foods or cosmetics are manufactured, processed, packed, or held for introduction into commerce, to enter a vehicle being used to transport or hold these foods or cosmetics in commerce, or to an aquatic farm in order to

inspect a factory, warehouse, establishment, vehicle, or aquatic farm to determine if the provisions of the commissioner’s respective portions of this chapter are being violated; and

secure samples or specimens of a food, aquatic farm product, or cosmetic.

The commissioner of environmental conservation shall make or have made examinations of samples secured under this section to determine whether or not a provision of the commissioner’s respective portions of this chapter is being violated.

The commissioner of health and social services has the same powers and duties with respect to drugs and devices as the commissioner of environmental conservation has with respect to food and cosmetics under (a) and (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 22 ch 129 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 80 SLA 1957; am E.O. No. 51, § 21 (1981); am § 17 ch 72 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For management and personnel, see 18 AAC 31, art. 3.

For food processing, see 18 AAC 31, art. 7.

For reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32, art. 3.

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

For requirements for fishing vessels, tender vessels, buying stations, and processing facilities in response to oil contamination, see 18 AAC 34, art. 6.

Collateral references. —

Validity of inspection conducted under provisions of Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 USCS § 374(a)) authorizing FDA inspectors to enter and inspect food, drug or cosmetic factory, warehouse, or other establishment, 18 ALR Fed. 734.

Sec. 17.20.210.
Reimbursement for expenses. [Repealed, § 26 ch 72 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 17.20.220.
Publication of reports and information.

The commissioner of environmental conservation and the commissioner of health and social services may have published from time to time reports summarizing judgments, decrees, and court orders which have been rendered under their respective portions of this chapter, including the nature of the charge and the disposition of it.

The commissioner of environmental conservation may have disseminated information regarding food and cosmetics which the commissioner considers necessary in the interest of public health and the protection of the consumer against fraud. This section does not prohibit the commissioner from collecting, reporting, and illustrating the results of the commissioner’s investigations.

The commissioner of health and social services has the same power with respect to drugs and devices as the commissioner of environmental conservation has with respect to food and cosmetics under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 23 ch 129 SLA 1949; am E.O. No. 51, § 23 (1981))

Sec. 17.20.230.
Detention or embargo of goods.

Whenever the commissioner of environmental conservation finds or has probable cause to believe that a food or cosmetic is adulterated, or so misbranded as to be dangerous or fraudulent within the meaning of this chapter, the commissioner shall affix to it a tag or other appropriate marking, giving notice that it is or is suspected of being adulterated or misbranded and has been detained or embargoed, and warning all persons not to remove or dispose of it by sale or otherwise until permission for removal or disposal is given by the commissioner or the court. A person may not remove or dispose of a detained or embargoed article by sale or otherwise without this permission.

The commissioner of health and social services has the same duty with respect to drugs and devices as the commissioner of environmental conservation has with respect to food and cosmetics under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 6(a) ch 129 SLA 1949; am E.O. No. 51, § 24 (1981))

Administrative Code. —

For reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32, art. 3.

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

Sec. 17.20.240.
Petition for libel for condemnation.

When an article detained or embargoed under AS

17.20.230

has been found by the commissioner of environmental conservation or the commissioner of health and social services, as the case may be, to be adulterated or misbranded, the appropriate commissioner shall petition the superior court for a libel for condemnation of the article.
When that commissioner finds that a detained or embargoed article is not adulterated or misbranded, the commissioner shall remove the tag or other marking.

History.

(§ 6(b) ch 129 SLA 1949; am E.O. No. 51, § 25 (1981))

Administrative Code. —

For reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32, art. 3.

Sec. 17.20.250.
Destruction of adulterated or misbranded goods.

If the superior court finds that a detained or embargoed article is adulterated or misbranded, it shall, after entry of the decree, be destroyed at the expense of the claimant, under the supervision of the commissioner of environmental conservation or the commissioner of health and social services, as the case may be.
Court costs and fees and storage and other proper expenses shall be taxed against the claimant of the article.

History.

(§ 6(c) ch 129 SLA 1949; am E.O. No. 51, § 26 (1981))

Administrative Code. —

For reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32, art. 3.

Sec. 17.20.260.
Exemption from destruction.

When the adulteration or misbranding can be corrected by proper labeling or processing of the article, and after entry of the decree and after costs, fees, and expenses have been paid and a good and sufficient bond, conditioned that the article will be properly labeled or processed has been executed, the court may order that the article be delivered to the claimant for labeling or processing under the supervision of the commissioner of environmental conservation or the commissioner of health and social services, as the case may be.
The claimant shall pay the expense of supervision.
The bond shall be returned to the claimant of the article on representation to the court by the appropriate commissioner that the article is no longer in violation of this chapter, and that the expenses of supervision have been paid.

History.

(§ 6(c) ch 129 SLA 1949; am E.O. No. 51, § 27 (1981))

Sec. 17.20.270.
Immediate destruction of contaminated food.

Meat, seafood, poultry, vegetable, fruit, or other perishable article in any room, building, vehicle of transportation, or other structure which is unsound, or contains filthy, decomposed, or putrid substance, or a substance that may be poisonous or deleterious to health or otherwise unsafe, is a nuisance. Whenever the commissioner of environmental conservation finds such an article, the commissioner shall immediately condemn or destroy it or in any other manner render it unsalable as human food.

History.

(§ 6(d) ch 129 SLA 1949; am E.O. No. 51, § 28 (1981))

Administrative Code. —

For reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32, art. 3.

Sec. 17.20.280.
Injunction proceedings.

The commissioner of environmental conservation and the commissioner of health and social services may apply to the superior court for, and the court has jurisdiction to grant, a temporary or permanent injunction restraining a person from violating their respective portions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 4 ch 129 SLA 1949; am E.O. No. 51, § 29 (1981); am § 18 ch 72 SLA 1998)